Hawaii, session 2026, SB2667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291C-55, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§291C-55[]]  Oversized commercial vehicles; prohibition from using left lane.  (a) Upon any roadway having three or more lanes for traffic moving in the same direction, no commercial vehicle weighing ten thousand pounds or more nor any motor vehicle towing a vehicle or trailer, as defined in section 286-2, shall be driven in the far left lane unless[: (1)  The commercial vehicle is able to maintain speed with existing traffic flow; and (2)  The] the commercial vehicle or motor vehicle towing a vehicle or trailer is in the process of overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction under the rules governing such movement. (b) This section shall not apply to [commercial vehicles]: (1)  Commercial vehicles or motor vehicles towing a vehicle or trailer occupying the left lane for the purpose of turning left or exiting, or preparing to turn left or exit[.]; and (2)  Authorized emergency vehicles and motor vehicles used for public transit, school buses, tour buses, or other commercially operated passenger buses. (c)  A violation of this section shall subject the violator to the following penalties: (1)  For a first violation, or any violation not preceded within three years of a prior violation, a fine of not more than $250; (2)  For a second violation committed within three years of a prior violation, a fine of not more than $500; and (3)  For a third or subsequent violation committed within three years of a prior violation, a fine of not more than $1,000, attendance at a traffic safety course, or both. (d)  This section shall apply only to a county with a population of five hundred thousand or more. [(c)] (e)  For the purposes of this section, "commercial vehicle" [shall have] has the same meaning as in section 291‑11.5. "Commercial vehicle" does not include buses or van pools operated by the counties." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.